Hawaii statutes.
[§448E-12] Inspections. Nothing in
this chapter should deprive the several counties of the right to perform
electrical or plumbing inspections, as regulated by their respective
ordinances. [L 1971, c 183, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next